Florida, session 2026, HJR947.
Be It Enacted by
412 the Legislature of the State of Florida:".
413 SECTION 8. Executive approval and veto.—
414 (a) Every bill passed by the legislature shall be
415 presented to the governor for approval and shall become a law if
416 the governor approves and signs it, or fails to veto it within
417 seven consecutive days after presentation. If during that period
418 or on the seventh day the legislature adjourns sine die or takes
419 a recess of more than thirty days, the governor shall have
420 fifteen consecutive days from the date of presentation to act on
421 the bill. In all cases except general appropriation bills, the
422 veto shall extend to the entire bill. Except for specific
423 appropriations directed to the legislative branch, the governor
424 may veto any specific appropriation in a general appropriation
425 bill, but may not veto any qualification or restriction without
Page 17 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
426 also vetoing the appropriation to which it relates.
427 (b) When a bill or any specific appropriation of a general
428 appropriation bill has been vetoed, the governor shall transmit
429 signed objections thereto to the house in which the bill
430 originated if in session. If that house is not in session, the
431 governor shall file them with the custodian of state records,
432 who shall lay them before that house at its next regular or
433 special session, whichever occurs first, and they shall be
434 entered on its journal. If the originating house votes to re-
435 enact a vetoed measure, whether in a regular or special session,
436 and the other house does not consider or fails to re-enact the
437 vetoed measure, no further consideration by either house at any
438 subsequent session may be taken. If a vetoed measure is
439 presented at a special session and the originating house does
440 not consider it, the measure will be available for consideration
441 at any intervening special session and until the end of the next
442 regular session.
443 (c) If each house shall, by a two-thirds vote, re-enact
444 the bill or reinstate the vetoed specific appropriation of a
445 general appropriation bill, the vote of each member voting shall
446 be entered on the respective journals, and the bill shall become
447 law or the specific appropriation reinstated, the veto
448 notwithstanding.
449 SECTION 15. Terms and qualifications of legislators.—
450 (a) SENATORS. Senators shall be elected for terms of four
Page 18 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
451 years, those from odd-numbered districts in the years the
452 numbers of which are multiples of four and those from even-
453 numbered districts in even-numbered years the numbers of which
454 are not multiples of four; except, at the election next
455 following a reapportionment, some senators shall be elected for
456 terms of two years when necessary to maintain staggered terms.
457 (b) REPRESENTATIVES. Members of the house of
458 representatives shall be elected for terms of two years in each
459 even-numbered year.
460 (c) QUALIFICATIONS. Each legislator shall be at least
461 twenty-one years of age, an elector and resident of the district
462 from which elected and shall have resided in the state for a
463 period of two years prior to election.
464 (d) ASSUMING OFFICE; VACANCIES. Members of the
465 legislature shall take office upon election. Unless the office
466 become vacant less than one hundred eighty days before a general
467 election, vacancies in legislative office shall be filled only
468 by a special election held no more than one hundred twenty days
469 after the office became vacant as provided by law.
470 SECTION 16. Legislative apportionment.—
471 (a) INDEPENDENT REDISTRICTING COMMISSIONS. The state
472 shall be apportioned by three independent redistricting
473 commissions, one each for the senatorial, representative, and
474 congressional redistricting process.
475 (1)a. Each redistricting commission shall establish a
Page 19 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
476 screening panel consisting of thirty-seven members. The
477 president of the senate, the speaker of the house of
478 representatives, the minority leader of the house of
479 representatives, and the minority leader of the senate shall
480 each appoint nine members. The chief justice of the supreme
481 court shall appoint one member.
482 b. To apply for a commissioner position, an applicant must
483 have voted in two out of the last three presidential elections
484 and two out of the last three gubernatorial elections. The
485 following persons may not apply for a commissioner position or
486 serve as commissioner:
487 1. A person who is currently serving, or who has served,
488 in an office or position which is filled by vote of the
489 electors.
490 2. A person who, within the past fourteen years, has been
491 a party officer, a registered lobbyist, or paid while working as
492 part of a campaign staff, or has worked for the executive office
493 of the governor.
494 3. A person who, within the past eighteen years, has
495 worked for the legislature.
496 4. A parent, spouse, child, sibling, parent-in-law, child-
497 in-law, or sibling-in-law of, or a cohabitating member of a
498 household, of a person in sub-subparagraphs 1. through 3.
499 c. After review, the screening panel shall select for
500 further consideration fifteen applicants from each of the
Page 20 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
501 following categories:
502 1. Applicants who are registered members of the political
503 party that received the most votes in the last statewide
504 election.
505 2. Applicants who are registered members of the political
506 party that received the second-most votes in the last statewide
507 election.
508 3. Applicants who are registered as independent or members
509 of a minor political party.
510
511 The screening panel shall ensure the selected applicants are, as
512 a whole, representative of the racial, ethnic, geographic, and
513 gender diversity of the state.
514 (2)a. The president of the senate, the speaker of the
515 house of representatives, the minority leader of the senate, and
516 the minority leader of the house of representatives may each
517 strike two applicants from each of the categories described in
518 subparagraphs (1)b.1. through 3.
519 b. The screening panel shall then randomly draw five
520 applicants from each of the categories described in
521 subparagraphs (1)b.1 through 3. to create each final independent
522 redistricting commission.
523 (3) The terms of the initial group of commissioners shall
524 begin in 2027. Each commissioner shall serve a ten-year term and
525 may not serve consecutive terms. A person running for office may
Page 21 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
526 not have served on the commission that drew the district for
527 that office during his or her term or within ten years after the
528 promulgation of those maps.
529 (4) A member of the commission shall receive compensation
530 fixed at the legislative per diem rate during commission travel
531 and meetings and shall be allowed all reasonable and necessary
532 expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties.
533 (5)a. All meetings shall take place in person and be
534 streamed on a publicly available website.
535 b. All records and documents of the commission, including
536 a person or group performing delegated functions of the
537 commission or advising the commission, related to the
538 commission's work shall be considered public record. This
539 includes internal communications of the commission and
540 communications made to the commission.
541 c. Commissioners, staff of the commission, and any other
542 advisor or consultant to the commission may only communicate
543 with a person outside the commission about matters related to
544 reapportionment in a public meeting or hearing. This does not
545 include written public comments submitted to the commission,
546 staff of the commission, or any other advisor or consultant to
547 the commission.
548 (6) If the commission hires legal counsel the commission
549 as an entity shall be considered the client.
550 (7) The commission shall establish and maintain a public
Page 22 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
551 website or other equivalent electronic platform to share
552 information about the commission's activities. Prior to voting
553 on any proposed plan, the commission must publish the proposed
554 plan to the website. The website must:
555 a. Be capable of receiving comments and proposals by
556 citizens of the state.
557 b. Include a public submission portal for map drawing,
558 which shall open on the website on January 1 of a year ending in
559 one.
560 c. Include all data used by the commission in the drawing
561 of districts. Such data, including census data, precinct maps,
562 election results, and shapefiles, shall be posted to the website
563 within three days after receipt by the commission.
564 (b) DISTRICT MAPS.
565 (1) Each commission shall reapportion the state by
566 creating three district maps. Each map shall be drawn according
567 to Sections 20 and 21 of Article III.
568 (2) The commission shall adopt three final district maps.
569 The maps must be approved by at least two-thirds of the
570 commissioners, including at least two commissioners registered
571 as independent or minor party affiliates.
572 (3) Before adopting a final map, the commission must hold
573 at least two public hearings in each state appellate district
574 and at least two public hearings in each county with a
575 population of 1 million or more to seek public input. All
Page 23 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
576 meetings and hearings held by the commission shall be adequately
577 advertised and planned to ensure the public is able to attend
578 and participate fully. Meetings and hearings must have
579 advertisements in, at minimum, in English, Spanish, Haitian
580 Creole, and Portuguese.
581 (c)(a) SENATORIAL AND REPRESENTATIVE DISTRICTS. The
582 legislature at its regular session in the second year following
583 each decennial census, by joint resolution approved by a
584 majority vote of each chamber, shall adopt one of the maps
585 created by the commission to apportion the state in accordance
586 with the constitution of the state and of the United States into
587 not less than thirty nor more than forty consecutively numbered
588 senatorial districts of either contiguous, overlapping or
589 identical territory, and into not less than eighty nor more than
590 one hundred twenty consecutively numbered representative
591 districts of either contiguous, overlapping or identical
592 territory. A map from the commission may be amended by the
593 legislature only if the amendment is approved by a three-
594 quarters vote of each chamber. The legislature must adopt a
595 final map by the earlier of July 1st of a year ending in one or
596 sixty days after receipt of census data. The legislature shall
597 be barred from all other involvement. The legislature may
598 authorize an extension until December 15 in the event of an
599 extraordinary circumstance. As used in this subsection, an
600 "extraordinary circumstance" means an invasion of the state by a
Page 24 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
601 hostile foreign power and recognized as such by an act of
602 Congress, a pandemic declared as such by the President of the
603 United States, or a natural disaster declared as such by the
604 President of the United States Should that session adjourn
605 without adopting such joint resolution, the governor by
606 proclamation shall reconvene the legislature within thirty days
607 in special apportionment session which shall not exceed thirty
608 consecutive days, during which no other business shall be
609 transacted, and it shall be the mandatory duty of the
610 legislature to adopt a joint resolution of apportionment.
611 (d)(b) FAILURE OF LEGISLATURE TO APPORTION; JUDICIAL MAP
612 SELECTION REAPPORTIONMENT. In the event a special apportionment
613 session of the legislature fails to adopt finally adjourns
614 without adopting a joint resolution of apportionment, the
615 supreme court shall select the most compact map out of the three
616 submitted without amendment. The supreme court may hire up to
617 two special masters for assistance with the selection the
618 attorney general shall, within five days, petition the supreme
619 court of the state to make such apportionment. No later than the
620 sixtieth day after the filing of such petition, the supreme
621 court shall file with the custodian of state records an order
622 making such apportionment.
623 (e)(c) LEGAL CHALLENGES TO JUDICIAL REVIEW OF
624 APPORTIONMENT. Within fifteen days after the passage of the
625 joint resolution of apportionment, the attorney general shall
Page 25 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
626 petition The supreme court of the state shall have original and
627 exclusive jurisdiction of any case for a declaratory judgment
628 determining the validity of the apportionment. The supreme
629 court, in accordance with its rules, shall permit adversary
630 interests to present their views and, within thirty days from
631 the filing of the petition, shall enter its judgment. A justice
632 who has a close relationship with a member of the United States
633 Congress or of the legislature has a conflict of interest in the
634 case and may not participate in any hearing or decision related
635 to a case brought under this subsection. As used in this
636 subsection, "close relationship" means a parent, spouse, child,
637 sibling, parent-in-law, child-in-law, or sibling-in-law of, or a
638 cohabitating member of a household with a member of the United
639 States Congress or of the legislature.
640 (f)(d) EFFECT OF JUDGMENT IN APPORTIONMENT; EXTRAORDINARY
641 APPORTIONMENT SESSION. A judgment of the supreme court of the
642 state determining the apportionment to be valid shall be binding
643 upon all the citizens of the state. Should the supreme court
644 determine that the apportionment made by the legislature is
645 invalid, the governor by proclamation shall reconvene the
646 independent redistricting commissions to determine and propose a
647 reapportionment plan to remedy the unlawful or unconstitutional
648 district in a manner that minimally interferes with other
649 districts legislature within five days thereafter in
650 extraordinary apportionment session which shall not exceed
Page 26 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
651 fifteen days, during which the legislature shall adopt a joint
652 resolution of apportionment conforming to the judgment of the
653 supreme court.
654 (e) EXTRAORDINARY APPORTIONMENT SESSION; REVIEW OF
655 APPORTIONMENT. Within fifteen days after the adjournment of an
656 extraordinary apportionment session, the attorney general shall
657 file a petition in the supreme court of the state setting forth
658 the apportionment resolution adopted by the legislature, or if
659 none has been adopted reporting that fact to the court.
660 Consideration of the validity of a joint resolution of
661 apportionment shall be had as provided for in cases of such
662 joint resolution adopted at a regular or special apportionment
663 session.
664 (f) JUDICIAL REAPPORTIONMENT. Should an extraordinary
665 apportionment session fail to adopt a resolution of
666 apportionment or should the supreme court determine that the
667 apportionment made is invalid, the court shall, not later than
668 sixty days after receiving the petition of the attorney general,
669 file with the custodian of state records an order making such
670 apportionment.
671 SECTION 17. Impeachment.—
672 (a) The governor, lieutenant governor, members of the
673 cabinet, members of the executive council, members of the board
674 of equalization, members of the board of control, members of the
675 board of utility directors, justices of the supreme court,
Page 27 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
676 judges of district courts of appeal, judges of circuit courts,
677 and judges of county courts shall be liable to impeachment for
678 misdemeanor in office. The house of representatives by two-
679 thirds vote shall have the power to impeach an officer. The
680 speaker of the house of representatives shall have power at any
681 time to appoint a committee to investigate charges against any
682 officer subject to impeachment.
683 (b) An officer impeached by the house of representatives
684 shall be disqualified from performing any official duties until
685 acquitted by the senate, and, unless impeached, the governor may
686 by appointment fill the office until completion of the trial.
687 (c) All impeachments by the house of representatives shall
688 be tried by the senate. The chief justice of the supreme court,
689 or another justice designated by the chief justice, shall
690 preside at the trial, except in a trial of the chief justice, in
691 which case the governor shall preside. The senate shall
692 determine the time for the trial of any impeachment and may sit
693 for the trial whether the house of representatives be in session
694 or not. The time fixed for trial shall not be more than six
695 months after the impeachment. During an impeachment trial
696 senators shall be upon their oath or affirmation. No officer
697 shall be convicted without the concurrence of two-thirds of the
698 members of the senate present. Judgment of conviction in cases
699 of impeachment shall remove the offender from office and, in the
700 discretion of the senate, may include disqualification to hold
Page 28 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
701 any office of honor, trust or profit. Conviction or acquittal
702 shall not affect the civil or criminal responsibility of the
703 officer.
704 SECTION 19. State Budgeting, Planning and Appropriations
705 Processes.—
706 (a) ANNUAL BUDGETING.
707 (1) General law shall prescribe the adoption of annual
708 state budgetary and planning processes and require that detail
709 reflecting the annualized costs of the state budget and
710 reflecting the nonrecurring costs of the budget requests shall
711 accompany state department and agency legislative budget
712 requests, the governor's recommended budget, and appropriation
713 bills.
714 (2) Unless approved by a three-fifths vote of the
715 membership of each house, appropriations made for recurring
716 purposes from nonrecurring general revenue funds for any fiscal
717 year shall not exceed three percent of the total general revenue
718 funds estimated to be available at the time such appropriation
719 is made.
720 (3) As prescribed by general law, each state department
721 and agency shall be required to submit a legislative budget
722 request that is based upon and that reflects the long-range
723 financial outlook adopted by the joint legislative budget
724 commission or that specifically explains any variance from the
725 long-range financial outlook contained in the request.
Page 29 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
726 (4) For purposes of this section, the terms department and
727 agency shall include the judicial branch.
728 (b) APPROPRIATION BILLS FORMAT. Separate sections within
729 the general appropriation bill shall be used for each major
730 program area of the state budget; major program areas shall
731 include: education enhancement "lottery" trust fund items;
732 education (all other funds); human services; criminal justice
733 and corrections; natural resources, environment, growth
734 management, and transportation; general government; and judicial
735 branch. Each major program area shall include an itemization of
736 expenditures for: state operations; state capital outlay; aid to
737 local governments and nonprofit organizations operations; aid to
738 local governments and nonprofit organizations capital outlay;
739 federal funds and the associated state matching funds; spending
740 authorizations for operations; and spending authorizations for
741 capital outlay. Additionally, appropriation bills passed by the
742 legislature shall include an itemization of specific
743 appropriations that exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)
744 in 1992 dollars. For purposes of this subsection, "specific
745 appropriation," "itemization," and "major program area" shall be
746 defined by law. This itemization threshold shall be adjusted by
747 general law every four years to reflect the rate of inflation or
748 deflation as indicated in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
749 Consumers, U.S. City Average, All Items, or successor reports as
750 reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of
Page 30 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
751 Labor Statistics or its successor. Substantive bills containing
752 appropriations shall also be subject to the itemization
753 requirement mandated under this provision and shall be subject
754 to the governor's specific appropriation veto power described in
755 Article III, Section 8.
756 (c) APPROPRIATIONS PROCESS.
757 (1) No later than September 15 of each year, the joint
758 legislative budget commission shall issue a long-range financial
759 outlook setting out recommended fiscal strategies for the state
760 and its departments and agencies in order to assist the
761 legislature in making budget decisions. The long-range financial
762 outlook must include major workload and revenue estimates. In
763 order to implement this paragraph, the joint legislative budget
764 commission shall use current official consensus estimates and
765 may request the development of additional official estimates.
766 (2) The joint legislative budget commission shall seek
767 input from the public and from the executive and judicial
768 branches when developing and recommending the long-range
769 financial outlook.
770 (3) The legislature shall prescribe by general law
771 conditions under which limited adjustments to the budget, as
772 recommended by the governor or the chief justice of the supreme
773 court, may be approved without the concurrence of the full
774 legislature.
775 (d) NINETY-SIX SEVENTY-TWO HOUR PUBLIC REVIEW PERIOD. All
Page 31 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
776 general appropriation bills shall be furnished to each member of
777 the legislature, each member of the cabinet, the governor, and
778 the chief justice of the supreme court at least ninety-six
779 seventy-two hours before final passage by either house of the
780 legislature of the bill in the form that will be presented to
781 the governor.
782 (e) FINAL BUDGET REPORT. A final budget report shall be
783 prepared as prescribed by general law. The final budget report
784 shall be produced no later than the 120th day after the
785 beginning of the fiscal year, and copies of the report shall be
786 furnished to each member of the legislature, the head of each
787 department and agency of the state, the auditor general, and the
788 chief justice of the supreme court.
789 (f) TRUST FUNDS.
790 (1) No trust fund of the State of Florida or other public
791 body may be created or re-created by law without a three-fifths
792 vote of the membership of each house of the legislature in a
793 separate bill for that purpose only.
794 (2) State trust funds shall terminate not more than four
795 years after the effective date of the act authorizing the
796 initial creation of the trust fund. By law the legislature may
797 set a shorter time period for which any trust fund is
798 authorized.
799 (3) Trust funds required by federal programs or mandates;
800 trust funds established for bond covenants, indentures, or
Page 32 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
801 resolutions, whose revenues are legally pledged by the state or
802 public body to meet debt service or other financial requirements
803 of any debt obligations of the state or any public body; the
804 state transportation trust fund; the trust fund containing the
805 net annual proceeds from the Florida Education Lotteries; the
806 Florida retirement trust fund; trust funds for institutions
807 under the management of the Board of Control Board of Governors,
808 where such trust funds are for auxiliary enterprises and
809 contracts, grants, and donations, as those terms are defined by
810 general law; trust funds that serve as clearing funds or
811 accounts for the controller chief financial officer or state
812 agencies; trust funds that account for assets held by the state
813 in a trustee capacity as an agent or fiduciary for individuals,
814 private organizations, or other governmental units; and other
815 trust funds authorized by this Constitution, are not subject to
816 the requirements set forth in paragraph (2) of this subsection.
817 (4) All cash balances and income of any trust funds
818 abolished under this subsection shall be deposited into the
819 general revenue fund.
820 (g) BUDGET STABILIZATION FUND. Subject to the provisions
821 of this subsection, an amount equal to at least 5% of the last
822 completed fiscal year's net revenue collections for the general
823 revenue fund shall be retained in the budget stabilization fund.
824 The budget stabilization fund's principal balance shall not
825 exceed an amount equal to 10% of the last completed fiscal
Page 33 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
826 year's net revenue collections for the general revenue fund. The
827 legislature shall provide criteria for withdrawing funds from
828 the budget stabilization fund in a separate bill for that
829 purpose only and only for the purpose of covering revenue
830 shortfalls of the general revenue fund or for the purpose of
831 providing funding for an emergency, as defined by general law.
832 General law shall provide for the restoration of this fund. The
833 budget stabilization fund shall be comprised of funds not
834 otherwise obligated or committed for any purpose.
835 (h) LONG-RANGE STATE PLANNING DOCUMENT AND DEPARTMENT AND
836 AGENCY PLANNING DOCUMENT PROCESSES. General law shall provide
837 for a long-range state planning document. The governor shall
838 recommend to the legislature biennially any revisions to the
839 long-range state planning document, as defined by law. General
840 law shall require a biennial review and revision of the long-
841 range state planning document and shall require all departments
842 and agencies of state government to develop planning documents
843 that identify statewide strategic goals and objectives,
844 consistent with the long-range state planning document. The
845 long-range state planning document and department and agency
846 planning documents shall remain subject to review and revision
847 by the legislature. The long-range state planning document must
848 include projections of future needs and resources of the state
849 which are consistent with the long-range financial outlook. The
850 department and agency planning documents shall include a
Page 34 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
851 prioritized listing of planned expenditures for review and
852 possible reduction in the event of revenue shortfalls, as
853 defined by general law.
854 (i) GOVERNMENT EFFICIENCY TASK FORCE. No later than
855 January of 2007, and each fourth year thereafter, The president
856 of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and
857 the governor shall appoint a government efficiency task force,
858 the membership of which shall be established by general law. The
859 task force shall be composed of members of the legislature and
860 representatives from the private and public sectors who shall
861 develop recommendations for improving governmental operations
862 and reducing costs. Staff to assist the task force in performing
863 its duties shall be assigned by general law, and the task force
864 may obtain assistance from the private sector. The task force
865 shall complete a performance review of government programs. All
866 programs shall be ranked by budget and the top quartile must be
867 reviewed at least once every four years. The task force its work
868 within one year and shall submit its recommendations to the
869 joint legislative budget commission, the governor, and the chief
870 justice of the supreme court.
871 (j) JOINT LEGISLATIVE BUDGET COMMISSION. There is created
872 within the legislature the joint legislative budget commission
873 composed of equal numbers of senate members appointed by the
874 president of the senate and house members appointed by the
875 speaker of the house of representatives. Each member shall serve
Page 35 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
876 at the pleasure of the officer who appointed the member. A
877 vacancy on the commission shall be filled in the same manner as
878 the original appointment. From November of each odd-numbered
879 year through October of each even-numbered year, the chairperson
880 of the joint legislative budget commission shall be appointed by
881 the president of the senate and the vice chairperson of the
882 commission shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of
883 representatives. From November of each even-numbered year
884 through October of each odd-numbered year, the chairperson of
885 the joint legislative budget commission shall be appointed by
886 the speaker of the house of representatives and the vice
887 chairperson of the commission shall be appointed by the
888 president of the senate. The joint legislative budget commission
889 shall be governed by the joint rules of the senate and the house
890 of representatives, which shall remain in effect until repealed
891 or amended by concurrent resolution. The commission shall
892 convene at least quarterly and shall convene at the call of the
893 president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
894 representatives. A majority of the commission members of each
895 house plus one additional member from either house constitutes a
896 quorum. Action by the commission requires a majority vote of the
897 commission members present of each house. The commission may
898 conduct its meetings through teleconferences or similar means.
899 In addition to the powers and duties specified in this
900 subsection, the joint legislative budget commission shall
Page 36 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
901 exercise all other powers and perform any other duties not in
902 conflict with paragraph (c)(3) and as prescribed by general law
903 or joint rule.
904 (k) REVENUE ESTIMATING CONFERENCE. A nonpartisan revenue
905 estimating conference shall be responsible for creating all
906 revenue forecasts.
907 (l) PROHIBITION ON SUBSIDIZATION OF UNDERFUNDED COUNTIES.
908 A county may not be required to subsidize another county through
909 the budget. The budget must provide each county with services
910 and funding equal to at least eighty percent of the amount of
911 state taxation collected as a result of economic activity in
912 such county.
913 ARTICLE IV
914 EXECUTIVE
915 SECTION 1. Governor.—
916 (a) The supreme executive power shall be vested in a
917 governor, who shall be commander-in-chief of all military forces
918 of the state not in active service of the United States. The
919 governor shall take care that the laws be faithfully executed,
920 commission all officers of the state and counties, and transact
921 all necessary business with the officers of government. The
922 governor may require information in writing from all executive
923 or administrative state, county or municipal officers upon any
924 subject relating to the duties of their respective offices. The
925 governor shall be the chief administrative officer of the state
Page 37 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
926 responsible for the planning and budgeting for the state.
927 (b) The governor may initiate judicial proceedings in the
928 name of the state against any executive or administrative state,
929 county or municipal officer to enforce compliance with any duty
930 or restrain any unauthorized act.
931 (c) The governor may request in writing the opinion of the
932 justices of the supreme court as to the interpretation of any
933 portion of this constitution upon any question affecting the
934 governor's executive powers and duties. The justices shall,
935 subject to their rules of procedure, permit interested persons
936 to be heard on the questions presented and shall render their
937 written opinion not earlier than ten days from the filing and
938 docketing of the request, unless in their judgment the delay
939 would cause public injury.
940 (d) The governor shall have power to call out the militia
941 to preserve the public peace, execute the laws of the state,
942 suppress insurrection, or repel invasion.
943 (e) The governor shall by message at least once in each
944 regular session inform the legislature concerning the condition
945 of the state, propose such reorganization of the executive
946 department as will promote efficiency and economy, and recommend
947 measures in the public interest.
948 (f) When not otherwise provided for in this constitution,
949 the governor shall fill by appointment any vacancy in state or
950 county office for the remainder of the term of an appointive
Page 38 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
951 office, and for the remainder of the term of an elective office
952 if less than twenty-eight months, otherwise until the first
953 Tuesday after the first Monday following the next general
954 election. The governor shall make an appointment within thirty
955 days after an occurrence of a vacancy.
956 SECTION 2. Lieutenant governor.—There shall be a
957 lieutenant governor, who shall perform such duties pertaining to
958 the office of governor as shall be assigned by the governor,
959 except when otherwise provided by law, shall serve as the state
960 fire marshal; shall have authority the division of emergency
961 management, the Department of Veterans' Affairs, and the
962 Department of Military Affairs; and such other duties as may be
963 prescribed by law.
964 SECTION 3. Succession to office of governor; acting
965 governor.—
966 (a) Upon vacancy in the office of governor, the lieutenant
967 governor shall become governor. Further succession to the office
968 of governor shall be in the following order:
969 (1) The attorney general.
970 (2) The auditor general.
971 (3) The controller.
972 (4) The commissioner of health and insurance.
973 (5) The commissioner of labor.
974 (6) The commissioner of agriculture.
975 (7) The commissioner of lands.
Page 39 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
976 (8) The commissioner of education prescribed by law.
977
978 A successor shall serve for the remainder of the term, unless a
979 presidential election is scheduled before the end of the term,
980 in which case a special election for governor shall be held at
981 the same time as such presidential election.
982 (b) Upon impeachment of the governor and until completion
983 of trial thereof, or during the governor's physical or mental
984 incapacity, the lieutenant governor shall act as governor.
985 Further succession as acting governor shall be prescribed by
986 law. Incapacity to serve as governor may be determined by the
987 supreme court upon due notice after docketing of a written
988 petition from the attorney general who is acting with the
989 support of a majority of the executive council suggestion
990 thereof by three cabinet members, and in such case restoration
991 of capacity shall be similarly determined after docketing of
992 written suggestion thereof by the governor, the legislature, or
993 a majority of the executive council three cabinet members.
994 Incapacity to serve as governor may also be established by
995 certificate filed with the custodian of state records by the
996 governor declaring incapacity for physical reasons to serve as
997 governor, and in such case restoration of capacity shall be
998 similarly established.
999 SECTION 4. Cabinet.—
1000 (a) There shall be a cabinet composed of the lieutenant
Page 40 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1001 governor, an attorney general, an auditor general, a
1002 commissioner of health and insurance, a commissioner of labor, a
1003 commissioner of lands, a commissioner of education, a controller
1004 a chief financial officer, and a commissioner of agriculture. In
1005 addition to the powers and duties specified herein, they shall
1006 exercise such powers and perform such duties as may be
1007 prescribed by law. In the event of a tie vote of the governor
1008 and cabinet, the side on which the governor voted shall be
1009 deemed to prevail. A vacancy in the cabinet shall be filled
1010 using the line of succession for governor.
1011 (b) The attorney general shall be the chief state legal
1012 officer. There is created in the office of the attorney general
1013 the position of statewide prosecutor. The statewide prosecutor
1014 shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the state attorneys to
1015 prosecute violations of criminal laws occurring or having
1016 occurred, in two or more judicial circuits as part of a related
1017 transaction, or when any such offense is affecting or has
1018 affected two or more judicial circuits as provided by general
1019 law. The statewide prosecutor shall be appointed by the attorney
1020 general from not less than three persons nominated by the
1021 judicial nominating commission for the supreme court, or as
1022 otherwise provided by general law. The attorney general shall
1023 have authority over the Human Rights Commission, the Florida
1024 Commission on offender review, the Department of Elderly
1025 Affairs, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Department of
Page 41 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1026 Corrections, the division of administrative hearings,
1027 responsibilities and duties related to consumer affairs, and
1028 responsibilities and duties related to the licensing and
1029 regulation of firearms.
1030 (c) The controller chief financial officer shall serve as
1031 the chief fiscal officer of the state, and shall settle and
1032 approve accounts against the state, and shall keep all state
1033 funds and securities. The controller shall have authority over
1034 the Department of Revenue, the division of management services,
1035 and the Department of Financial Services.
1036 (d) The commissioner of agriculture shall have supervision
1037 of matters pertaining to agriculture except as otherwise
1038 provided by law.
1039 (e) The commissioner of labor shall have supervision of
1040 matters concerning labor, including all labor-related duties of
1041 the Secretary of the Department of Business and Professional
1042 Regulation, all duties of the secretary of commerce, and shall
1043 be the head of a department of labor. The commissioner shall be
1044 responsible for workplace inspections, other than inspections
1045 related to agriculture, and shall establish a board of
1046 occupations health and safety.
1047 (f) The auditor general shall be responsible for auditing
1048 public records and accounts. The annual appropriation for the
1049 work of the auditor general may not be less than the amount
1050 appropriated for the previous year, adjusted upward for
Page 42 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1051 inflation.
1052 (g) The commissioner of health and insurance shall have
1053 supervision over matters concerning insurance regulation and
1054 health, including all duties as the commissioner of insurance
1055 and shall have authority over the Florida housing finance
1056 corporation, the Department of Health, the Agency for Persons
1057 with Disabilities, the Department of Highway Safety and Motor
1058 Vehicles, and housing-related authority of the Department of
1059 Business and Professional Regulation. The surgeon general shall
1060 report to the commissioner of health and insurance.
1061 (h) The commissioner of education shall have supervision
1062 of matters pertaining to education and shall have authority over
1063 the Department of Education and the Department of Children and
1064 Families.
1065 (i) The commissioner of lands shall have supervision over
1066 the recording of property deeds and titles. The commissioner of
1067 lands is the head of the General Land Office and shall have
1068 authority over the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission,
1069 the Department of Environmental Protection, and the Department
1070 of Transportation.
1071 (e) The governor as chair, the controller chief financial
1072 officer, and the attorney general shall constitute the state
1073 board of administration, which shall succeed to all the power,
1074 control, and authority of the state board of administration
1075 established pursuant to Article IX, Section 16 of the
Page 43 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1076 Constitution of 1885, and which shall continue as a body at
1077 least for the life of Article XII, Section 9(c).
1078 (f) The governor as chair, the controller chief financial
1079 officer, the attorney general, and the commissioner of
1080 agriculture shall constitute the trustees of the internal
1081 improvement trust fund and the land acquisition trust fund as
1082 provided by law.
1083 (g) The governor as chair, the chief financial officer,
1084 the attorney general, and the commissioner of agriculture shall
1085 serve as constitute the agency head of the Department of Law
1086 Enforcement. The Office of Domestic Security and
1087 Counterterrorism is created within the Department of Law
1088 Enforcement. The Office of Domestic Security and
1089 Counterterrorism shall provide support for prosecutors and
1090 federal, state, and local law enforcement agencies that
1091 investigate or analyze information relating to attempts or acts
1092 of terrorism or that prosecute terrorism, and shall perform any
1093 other duties that are provided by law.
1094 SECTION 5. Election of governor, lieutenant governor and
1095 cabinet members; qualifications; terms.—
1096 (a) At a state-wide general election in each calendar year
1097 the number of which is even but not a multiple of four, the
1098 electors shall choose a governor and a lieutenant governor and
1099 members of the cabinet each for a term of four years beginning
1100 on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in January of the
Page 44 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1101 succeeding year. In primary elections, candidates for the office
1102 of governor may choose to run without a lieutenant governor
1103 candidate. In the general election, all Candidates for the
1104 offices of governor and lieutenant governor shall be elected
1105 separately form joint candidacies in a manner prescribed by law
1106 so that each voter shall cast a single vote for a candidate for
1107 governor and a candidate for lieutenant governor running
1108 together.
1109 (b) When elected, the governor, lieutenant governor and
1110 each cabinet member must be an elector not less than thirty
1111 years of age who has resided in the state for the preceding
1112 seven years. The attorney general must have been a member of the
1113 bar of Florida for the preceding five years. No person who has,
1114 or but for resignation would have, served as governor or acting
1115 governor for more than six years in two consecutive terms shall
1116 be elected governor for the succeeding term.
1117 SECTION 6. Executive departments.—All functions of the
1118 executive branch of state government shall be allotted among not
1119 more than twenty-five departments, exclusive of those
1120 specifically provided for or authorized in this constitution.
1121 The administration of each department, unless otherwise provided
1122 in this constitution, shall be placed by law under the direct
1123 supervision of the governor, the lieutenant governor, the
1124 governor and cabinet, a cabinet member, or an officer or board
1125 appointed by and serving at the pleasure of the governor,
Page 45 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1126 except:
1127 (a) When provided by law, Confirmation by a majority of
1128 the members of the senate in a public hearing noticed in advance
1129 or the approval of three members of the cabinet shall be
1130 required for appointment to or removal from any:
1131 (1) Elected designated statutory office.
1132 (2) Position as a head of an agency.
1133 (3) Position on a board of trustees.
1134 (4) Position appointed by the governor on any board or
1135 authority.
1136 (5) Judicial appointments by the governor.
1137
1138 If the confirmation is not finalized during the next scheduled
1139 legislative session after the appointment, the appointment shall
1140 be deemed rejected. A person who is not confirmed within one
1141 hundred eighty days after being appointed must resign the
1142 appointment. A member of the senate who takes part in the
1143 confirmation hearing must disclose any conflict of interest. If
1144 the confirmation is for statewide office or the board of utility
1145 directors, there must be at least two hearings lasting at least
1146 two hours each before the vote to confirm. The prospective
1147 appointee must testify in person unless such person is unable to
1148 testify because of a medical emergency.
1149 (b) Boards authorized to grant and revoke licenses to
1150 engage in regulated occupations shall be assigned to appropriate
Page 46 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1151 departments and their members appointed for fixed terms, subject
1152 to removal only for cause.
1153 (c) Every four years the legislature shall appoint the
1154 secretary of state in a joint session held immediately after the
1155 general election in which the governor is elected.
1156 SECTION 7. Suspensions; filling office during
1157 suspensions.—
1158 (a) By executive order stating the grounds and filed with
1159 the custodian of state records, the governor may suspend from
1160 office any state officer not subject to impeachment, any officer
1161 of the militia not in the active service of the United States,
1162 or any county officer, indicted for a crime malfeasance,
1163 misfeasance, neglect of duty, drunkenness, incompetence,
1164 permanent inability to perform official duties, or commission of
1165 a felony, and may fill the office by appointment for the period
1166 of suspension. The suspended officer may at any time before
1167 removal be reinstated by the governor.
1168 (b) The senate may, in proceedings prescribed by law,
1169 remove from office or reinstate the suspended official and for
1170 such purpose the senate may be convened in special session by
1171 its president or by a majority of its membership.
1172 (c) By order of the governor any elected municipal officer
1173 indicted for crime may be suspended from office until acquitted
1174 and the office filled by appointment for the period of
1175 suspension, not to extend beyond the term, unless these powers
Page 47 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1176 are vested elsewhere by law or the municipal charter.
1177 SECTION 14. General land office.—There shall be a general
1178 land office that shall register all instruments relating to the
1179 ownership, transfer, or encumbrance of or claims against real
1180 property including deeds, leases, bills of sales, agreements,
1181 mortgages, notices of claims of lien, notices of levy, tax
1182 warrants, and tax executions, and the extensions, assignments
1183 releases, cancellations, or satisfactions of mortgages and
1184 liens. The commissioner of lands shall coordinate with each
1185 clerk of circuit court to transfer all existing instruments to
1186 the possession of the general land office. The legislature shall
1187 set fees for the recording of instruments at a level to allow
1188 the office to be self-sustaining.
1189 SECTION 15. Executive council.—There shall be an executive
1190 council composed of eleven executive councilors.
1191 (a) The independent redistricting commission responsible
1192 for representative redistricting shall divide the state into
1193 eleven districts, using the same criteria used for
1194 representative districts. One executive councilor shall be
1195 elected from each district at a general election to serve
1196 staggered four-year terms. Elections shall be partisan. The
1197 executive council shall have the following duties:
1198 (1) When requested by the governor, provide advice on
1199 affairs of the state.
1200 (2) Review state contracts of more than two hundred and
Page 48 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1201 fifty thousand dollars. The council may reject a contract by a
1202 majority vote. The value of contracts under this paragraph shall
1203 be adjusted annually on January 1 of each year for inflation
1204 using the percent change in the Consumer Price Index for All
1205 Urban Consumers, U.S. City Average, all items 1967=100, or
1206 successor reports for the preceding calendar year as initially
1207 reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of
1208 Labor Statistics, if such percent change is positive.
1209 (3) Review all pardon decisions made by the governor. The
1210 council may override the decision made by the governor by a
1211 majority vote.
1212 (4) For any position for which a nominating council is
1213 used, except for judicial nominations, the executive council
1214 shall choose the nominee to fill the open position.
1215 (5) Approve the budget by a majority vote.
1216 (b) A vacancy in the executive council shall be filled in
1217 the same manner as a vacancy in the legislature.
1218 (c) All resolutions and advice of the council must be
1219 recorded in writing by a member selected as secretary. Each
1220 member must sign the record to demonstrate he or she agrees with
1221 the accuracy of the record. If a member wishes to enter a
1222 dissenting opinion he or she may do so in writing.
1223 (d) Executive councilors shall be subject to the same
1224 staffing and salary rules as the legislature.
1225 (e) Each executive councilor shall be at least twenty-one
Page 49 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1226 years of age, an elector and resident of the district from which
1227 elected, and shall have resided in the state for a minimum of
1228 two years before election.
1229 (f) The executive councilors shall elect a chair for
1230 organizational purposes only.
1231 SECTION 16. Board of utility directors.—There shall be a
1232 board of utility directors composed of eleven utility directors.
1233 The commissioner of health and insurance and an ombudsman
1234 representing the interests of residents of the state shall be
1235 nonvoting members of the board.
1236 (a) The independent redistricting commission responsible
1237 for senatorial redistricting shall divide the state into eleven
1238 districts, using the same criteria used for senatorial
1239 districts. One utility director shall be elected from each
1240 district at an election held on the second Tuesday in March to
1241 serve staggered four-year terms. Elections shall be partisan.
1242 (b) A vacancy in the board of utility directors shall be
1243 filled in the same manner as a vacancy in the legislature.
1244 (c) Utility directors shall be subject to the same
1245 staffing and salary rules as the legislature.
1246 (d) A utility director, or a nominee for director, or a
1247 parent, spouse, child, sibling, parent-in-law, child-in-law, or
1248 sibling-in-law, or the cohabitating member of a household of
1249 such member or nominee, may not accept anything of value from
1250 any utility company, individual tied to a utility company, or
Page 50 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1251 political committee that has ties to a utility company.
1252 (e) Each utility director shall be at least twenty-one
1253 years of age, an elector and resident of the district from which
1254 elected, and shall have resided in the state for a period of two
1255 years before election.
1256 (f) The utility directors shall elect a chair for
1257 organizational purposes only.
1258 SECTION 17. Board of equalization.—There shall be a board
1259 of equalization composed of eleven members. The board is
1260 responsible for overseeing tax administration and collection.
1261 (a) The independent redistricting commission responsible
1262 for senatorial redistricting shall divide the state into eleven
1263 districts, using the same criteria used for senatorial
1264 districts. One member shall be elected from each district at a
1265 general election to serve staggered four-year terms. Elections
1266 shall be partisan.
1267 (b) A vacancy in the board of equalization shall be filled
1268 in the same manner as a vacancy in the legislature.
1269 (c) The members of the board of equalization shall be
1270 subject to the same staffing and salary rules as the
1271 legislature.
1272 (d) Each member of the board of equalization shall be at
1273 least twenty-one years of age, an elector and resident of the
1274 district from which elected, and shall have resided in the state
1275 for a period of two years before election.
Page 51 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1276 (e) The members of the board of equalization shall elect a
1277 chair for organizational purposes only.
1278 ARTICLE V
1279 JUDICIARY
1280 SECTION 11. Vacancies.—
1281 (a) Whenever a vacancy occurs in a judicial office to
1282 which election for retention applies, the attorney general
1283 governor shall fill the vacancy by appointing for a term ending
1284 on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in January of the
1285 year following the next general election occurring at least one
1286 year after the date of appointment, one of not fewer than three
1287 persons nor more than six persons nominated by the appropriate
1288 judicial nominating commission.
1289 (b) The attorney general governor shall fill each vacancy
1290 on a circuit court or on a county court, wherein the judges are
1291 elected by a majority vote of the electors, by appointing for a
1292 term ending on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in
1293 January of the year following the next primary and general
1294 election occurring at least one year after the date of
1295 appointment, one of not fewer than three persons nor more than
1296 six persons nominated by the appropriate judicial nominating
1297 commission. An election shall be held to fill that judicial
1298 office for the term of the office beginning at the end of the
1299 appointed term.
1300 (c) The nominations shall be made within thirty days from
Page 52 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1301 the occurrence of a vacancy unless the period is extended by the
1302 governor for a time not to exceed thirty days. The attorney
1303 general governor shall make the appointment within thirty sixty
1304 days from the occurrence of a vacancy after the nominations have
1305 been certified to the governor.
1306 (d) There shall be a separate judicial nominating
1307 commission as provided by general law for the supreme court,
1308 each district court of appeal, and each judicial circuit for all
1309 trial courts within the circuit. Uniform rules of procedure
1310 shall be established by the judicial nominating commissions at
1311 each level of the court system. Such rules, or any part thereof,
1312 may be repealed by general law enacted by a majority vote of the
1313 membership of each house of the legislature, or by the supreme
1314 court, five justices concurring. Except for deliberations of the
1315 judicial nominating commissions, the proceedings of the
1316 commissions and their records shall be open to the public.
1317 (e) The list created by the judicial nominating commission
1318 must be used and may not be rejected completely.
1319 ARTICLE VII
1320 SUFFRAGE AND ELECTIONS
1321 SECTION 4. Disqualifications.—
1322 (a) No person convicted of a felony, or adjudicated in
1323 this or any other state to be mentally incompetent, shall be
1324 qualified to vote or hold office until restoration of civil
1325 rights or removal of disability. Except as provided in
Page 53 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1326 subsection (b) of this section, any disqualification from voting
1327 arising from a felony conviction shall terminate and voting
1328 rights shall be restored upon completion of all terms of
1329 sentence including parole or probation.
1330 (b) No person convicted of murder or a felony sexual
1331 offense shall be qualified to vote until restoration of civil
1332 rights.
1333 (c) No person may appear on the ballot for re-election to
1334 any of the following offices:
1335 (1) Florida representative,
1336 (2) Florida senator,
1337 (3) Florida Lieutenant governor,
1338 (4) any office of the Florida cabinet,
1339 (3)(5) U.S. Representative from Florida, or
1340 (4)(6) U.S. Senator from Florida
1341
1342 if, by the end of the current term of office, the person will
1343 have served (or, but for resignation, would have served) in that
1344 office for eight consecutive years.
1345 (d) No person may appear on the ballot for re-election to
1346 any of the following offices:
1347 (1) Lieutenant governor, or
1348 (2) any office of the cabinet
1349
1350 if, by the end of the current term of office, the person will
Page 54 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1351 have served or, but for resignation would have served, in that
1352 office for twelve consecutive years.
1353 SECTION 8. Recall of elected officials.—
1354 (a) Any statewide elected official and member of the
1355 legislature may be removed from office by the electors pursuant
1356 to this section.
1357 (b)(1) In order to begin the recall process, the following
1358 number of proponents of the recall must sign a notice of
1359 intention:
1360 a. For a statewide office or a legislative member
1361 representing a district with at least one hundred thousand
1362 residents, five percent of the total number of registered
1363 electors in the electoral district or fifty proponents,
1364 whichever is greater.
1365 b. For a legislative member representing a district of at
1366 least one thousand residents but less than one hundred thousand
1367 residents, three percent of the total number of registered
1368 electors in the electoral district or thirty proponents,
1369 whichever is greater.
1370 c. For a legislative member representing a district of
1371 less than one thousand residents, thirty proponents.
1372 (c) The notice of intention must include the name of the
1373 person subject to potential recall, the office or legislative
1374 district he or she serves, a statement of two hundred words or
1375 less describing the reasons for recall, and the names and
Page 55 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1376 residential and mailing addresses of the required number of
1377 proponents of the recall.
1378 (d) The notice of intention must be served on the person
1379 subject to recall, published in a newspaper of general
1380 circulation, and filed with the secretary of state.
1381 (e) If the secretary of state determines the notice of
1382 recall is sufficient, the secretary of state shall provide a
1383 petition that may be used to collect signatures for the recall.
1384 Proponents may submit an alternative petition format that may be
1385 used upon approval by the secretary of state. The petition must
1386 require that each person signing the petition write, by his or
1387 her own hand, his or her signature, printed name, and
1388 residential address, including zip code. Only registered
1389 electors from the electoral district of the officer or member
1390 subject to the recall petition may sign a petition.
1391 (f) Petitions must only be circulated by an elector
1392 registered to vote in the electoral district of the officer or
1393 member subject to the recall petition. A petition circulator
1394 must sign a declaration verifying that he or she meets the
1395 requirements of this subsection.
1396 (g) A petition for recall must collect the following
1397 number of verified signatures:
1398 (1) For statewide office, there must be verified
1399 signatures from at least six counties in which the number of
1400 signatures in each county is more than 3 percent of the number
Page 56 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1401 of votes cast in the most recent election for such office, and
1402 the total number of signatures must be greater than 12 percent
1403 of the number of votes cast in the most recent election for such
1404 office.
1405 (2) For a legislative district, the total number of
1406 verified signatures must be greater than twenty percent of the
1407 number of votes case in the most recent election for such
1408 district.
1409 (h) Completed petitions for the recall of a statewide
1410 officer may be submitted to the supervisor of elections for the
1411 county in which the petition was circulated. The supervisor of
1412 elections shall verify the signatures either manually, if there
1413 are less than five hundred signatures, or by a random sampling
1414 method. The supervisor of elections shall update the secretary
1415 of state on the number of verified signatures every thirty days.
1416 (i) Completed petitions for the recall of a member of the
1417 legislature shall be returned to a supervisor of elections of a
1418 county within the electoral district of the member subject to
1419 the petition. The supervisor of elections shall verify the
1420 signatures either manually, if there are less than five hundred
1421 signatures, or by a random sampling method.
1422 (h) Within fourteen days after the required number of
1423 verified signatures have been collected, a recall election shall
1424 be scheduled within one hundred twenty days, unless there is
1425 general election scheduled within one hundred eighty days, in
Page 57 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1426 which case the recall will be held at the general election.
1427 (i) For a statewide office, a person who qualifies as a
1428 candidate for the office may submit himself or herself as a
1429 possible replacement sixty days or more before the recall
1430 election. The person subject to recall may not be a possible
1431 replacement.
1432 (j) For the recall of a statewide office the ballot shall
1433 read substantially as follows: "Shall (name of the statewide
1434 officer subject to recall) be recalled from (title of office)?"
1435 and include the list of replacement candidates who qualified
1436 under subsection (i). If a majority of electors vote in favor of
1437 the recall, the replacement candidate with the most votes shall
1438 take office for the remainder of the term.
1439 (k) For the recall of a member of the legislature, the
1440 ballot shall read substantially as follows: "Shall (name of the
1441 member of the legislature) be recalled from office as a member
1442 of the Florida (name of the house of the legislature in which
1443 such person serves)?".
1444 ARTICLE VIII
1445 LOCAL GOVERNMENT
1446 SECTION 1. Counties.—
1447 (a) POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS. The state shall be divided by
1448 law into political subdivisions called counties. Counties may be
1449 created, abolished or changed by law, with provision for payment
1450 or apportionment of the public debt.
Page 58 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1451 (b) COUNTY FUNDS. The care, custody and method of
1452 disbursing county funds shall be provided by general law.
1453 (c) GOVERNMENT. Pursuant to general or special law, a
1454 county government may be established by charter which shall be
1455 adopted, amended or repealed only upon vote of the electors of
1456 the county in a special election called for that purpose.
1457 (d) COUNTY OFFICERS. There shall be elected by the
1458 electors of each county, for terms of four years, a sheriff, a
1459 tax collector, a property appraiser, a supervisor of elections,
1460 and a clerk of the circuit court. Unless otherwise provided by
1461 special law approved by vote of the electors or pursuant to
1462 Article V, section 16, the clerk of the circuit court shall be
1463 ex officio clerk of the board of county commissioners, auditor,
1464 recorder and custodian of all county funds. Notwithstanding
1465 subsection 6(e) of this article, a county charter may not
1466 abolish the office of a sheriff, a tax collector, a property
1467 appraiser, a supervisor of elections, or a clerk of the circuit
1468 court; transfer the duties of those officers to another officer
1469 or office; change the length of the four-year term of office; or
1470 establish any manner of selection other than by election by the
1471 electors of the county.
1472 (e) COMMISSIONERS. Except when otherwise provided by
1473 county charter, the governing body of each county shall be a
1474 board of county commissioners composed of five or seven members
1475 serving staggered terms of four years. After each decennial
Page 59 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1476 census the board of county commissioners shall divide the county
1477 into districts of contiguous territory as nearly equal in
1478 population as practicable. One commissioner residing in each
1479 district shall be elected as provided by law.
1480 (f) NON-CHARTER GOVERNMENT. Counties not operating under
1481 county charters shall have such power of self-government as is
1482 provided by general or special law. The board of county
1483 commissioners of a county not operating under a charter may
1484 enact, in a manner prescribed by general law, county ordinances
1485 not inconsistent with general or special law, but an ordinance
1486 in conflict with a municipal ordinance shall not be effective
1487 within the municipality to the extent of such conflict. A non-
1488 charter government county may choose to adopt a charter upon a
1489 petition by forty percent of the number of the electors who
1490 participated in the most recent general election.
1491 (g) CHARTER GOVERNMENT. Counties operating under county
1492 charters shall have all powers of local self-government not
1493 inconsistent with general law, or with special law approved by
1494 vote of the electors. The governing body of a county operating
1495 under a charter may enact county ordinances not inconsistent
1496 with general law. The charter shall provide which shall prevail
1497 in the event of conflict between county and municipal
1498 ordinances.
1499 (h) TAXES; LIMITATION. Property situate within
1500 municipalities shall not be subject to taxation for services
Page 60 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1501 rendered by the county exclusively for the benefit of the
1502 property or residents in unincorporated areas.
1503 (i) COUNTY ORDINANCES. Each county ordinance shall be
1504 filed with the custodian of state records and shall become
1505 effective at such time thereafter as is provided by general law.
1506 (j) VIOLATION OF ORDINANCES. Persons violating county
1507 ordinances shall be prosecuted and punished as provided by law.
1508 (k) COUNTY SEAT. In every county there shall be a county
1509 seat at which shall be located the principal offices and
1510 permanent records of all county officers. The county seat may
1511 not be moved except as provided by general law. Branch offices
1512 for the conduct of county business may be established elsewhere
1513 in the county by resolution of the governing body of the county
1514 in the manner prescribed by law. No instrument shall be deemed
1515 recorded until filed at the county seat, or a branch office
1516 designated by the governing body of the county for the recording
1517 of instruments, according to law.
1518 ARTICLE IX
1519 EDUCATION
1520 SECTION 7. State University System.—
1521 (a) PURPOSES. In order to achieve excellence through
1522 teaching students, advancing research and providing public
1523 service for the benefit of Florida's citizens, their communities
1524 and economies, the people hereby establish a system of
1525 governance for the state university system of Florida.
Page 61 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1526 (b) STATE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM. There shall be a single
1527 state university system comprised of all public universities. A
1528 board of trustees shall administer each public university and a
1529 board of control board of governors shall govern the state
1530 university system.
1531 (c) LOCAL BOARDS OF TRUSTEES. Each local constituent
1532 university shall be administered by a board of trustees
1533 consisting of thirteen members dedicated to the purposes of the
1534 state university system. The board of control board of governors
1535 shall establish the powers and duties of the boards of trustees.
1536 Each board of trustees shall consist of six citizen members
1537 appointed by the governor and five citizen members appointed by
1538 the board of control board of governors. The appointed members
1539 shall be confirmed by the senate and serve staggered terms of
1540 five years as provided by law. The chair of the faculty senate,
1541 or the equivalent, and the president of the student body of the
1542 university shall also be members.
1543 (d) STATEWIDE BOARD OF CONTROL GOVERNORS. The board of
1544 control governors shall be an elected independent a body
1545 corporate consisting of eleven seventeen members. The
1546 independent redistricting commission responsible for senatorial
1547 redistricting shall divide the state into eleven districts,
1548 using the same criteria used for senatorial districts. One
1549 member of the board of control shall be elected from each
1550 district at a general election to serve staggered four-year
Page 62 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1551 terms. Elections shall be nonpartisan. The board shall operate,
1552 regulate, control, and be fully responsible for the management
1553 of the whole university system. These responsibilities shall
1554 include, but not be limited to, defining the distinctive mission
1555 of each constituent university and its articulation with free
1556 public schools and community colleges, ensuring the well-planned
1557 coordination and operation of the system, making employment
1558 decisions for university leadership and administration of
1559 universities, making recommendations to the taxation and budget
1560 reform commission, and avoiding wasteful duplication of
1561 facilities or programs. The board's management shall be subject
1562 to the powers of the legislature to appropriate for the
1563 expenditure of funds, and the board shall account for such
1564 expenditures as provided by law. The governor shall appoint to
1565 the board fourteen citizens dedicated to the purposes of the
1566 state university system. The appointed members shall be
1567 confirmed by the senate and serve staggered terms of seven years
1568 as provided by law. The commissioner of education and one
1569 student representative, one faculty representative, and one
1570 nonfaculty staff representative from each state university, the
1571 chair of the advisory council of faculty senates, or the
1572 equivalent, and the president of the Florida student
1573 association, or the equivalent, shall also be nonvoting members
1574 of the board. A vacancy on the board of control shall be filled
1575 in the same manner as a vacancy in the legislature. Members of
Page 63 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1576 the board of control shall be subject to the same staffing and
1577 salary rules as the legislature. Each member of the board of
1578 control shall be at least twenty years of age, be an elector and
1579 a resident of the district from which elected, and have resided
1580 in the state for a period of two years before election. Members
1581 of the board of control shall elect a chair for organizational
1582 purposes only.
1583 (e) FEES. Any proposal or action of a constituent
1584 university to raise, impose, or authorize any fee, as authorized
1585 by law, must be approved by at least nine affirmative votes of
1586 the members of the board of trustees of the constituent
1587 university, if approval by the board of trustees is required by
1588 general law, and at least twelve affirmative votes of the
1589 members of the board of control board of governors, if approval
1590 by the board of control board of governors is required by
1591 general law, in order to take effect. A fee under this
1592 subsection shall not include tuition.
1593 ARTICLE XI
1594 AMENDMENTS
1595 SECTION 1. Proposal by legislature.—Amendment of a section
1596 or revision of one or more articles, or the whole, of this
1597 constitution may be proposed by joint resolution agreed to by
1598 three-fifths of the membership of each house of the legislature.
1599 The full text of the joint resolution and the vote of each
1600 member voting shall be entered on the journal of each house.
Page 64 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1601 However, before such resolution may be placed on the ballot the
1602 legislature must explain the amendment in at least two public
1603 hearings in each appellate district and two public hearings in
1604 any county with a population of one million or more. All
1605 meetings and hearings held by the commission shall be adequately
1606 advertised and planned to ensure the public is able to attend
1607 and participate fully. Meetings and hearings must have
1608 advertisements in, at minimum, English, Spanish, Haitian Creole,
1609 and Portuguese.
1610 SECTION 3. Initiative.—The power to propose the revision
1611 or amendment of any portion or portions of this constitution by
1612 initiative is reserved to the people, provided that, any such
1613 revision or amendment, except for those limiting the power of
1614 government to raise revenue, shall embrace but one subject and
1615 matter directly connected therewith. It may be invoked by filing
1616 with the custodian of state records a petition containing a copy
1617 of the proposed revision or amendment, signed by a number of
1618 electors in each of one half of the congressional districts of
1619 the state, and of the state as a whole, equal to eight percent
1620 of the votes cast in each of such districts respectively and in
1621 the state as a whole in the last preceding election in which
1622 presidential electors were chosen. This section is the only
1623 authority regulating the initiative process. Any other law,
1624 rule, or ordinance concerning the initiative process that has
1625 gone into effect after January 1, 1999, is void.
Page 65 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1626 SECTION 5. Amendment or revision election.—
1627 (a) A proposed amendment to or revision of this
1628 constitution, or any part of it, shall be submitted to the
1629 electors at the next general election held more than ninety days
1630 after the joint resolution or report of revision commission,
1631 constitutional convention or taxation and budget reform
1632 commission proposing it is filed with the custodian of state
1633 records, unless, pursuant to law enacted by the affirmative vote
1634 of three-fourths of the membership of each house of the
1635 legislature and limited to a single amendment or revision, it is
1636 submitted at an earlier special election held more than ninety
1637 days after such filing.
1638 (b) A proposed amendment or revision of this constitution,
1639 or any part of it, by initiative shall be submitted to the
1640 electors at the general election provided the initiative
1641 petition is filed with the custodian of state records no later
1642 than February 1 of the year in which the general election is
1643 held.
1644 (c) The legislature shall provide by general law, prior to
1645 the holding of an election pursuant to this section, for the
1646 provision of a statement to the public regarding the probable
1647 financial impact of any amendment proposed by initiative
1648 pursuant to section 3.
1649 (d) Once in the tenth week, and once in the sixth week
1650 immediately preceding the week in which the election is held,
Page 66 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1651 the proposed amendment or revision, with notice of the date of
1652 election at which it will be submitted to the electors, shall be
1653 published in one newspaper of general circulation in each county
1654 in which a newspaper is published.
1655 (e) Unless otherwise specifically provided for elsewhere
1656 in this constitution, if the proposed amendment or revision is
1657 approved by vote of at least fifty-five sixty percent of the
1658 electors voting on the measure, it shall be effective as an
1659 amendment to or revision of the constitution of the state on the
1660 first Tuesday after the first Monday in January following the
1661 election, or on such other date as may be specified in the
1662 amendment or revision.
1663 ARTICLE XII
1664 SCHEDULE
1665 Transfer of duties and powers.—
1666 (a) The statutory jurisdiction and duties of the chief
1667 financial officer shall be transferred as constitutional duties
1668 to the controller. Any statutory authority given to the governor
1669 over the Department of Revenue, the Department of Management
1670 Services, and the Department of Financial Services shall become
1671 constitutional authority of the controller. This subsection does
1672 not apply to statutory authority over appointments.
1673 (b) The statutory jurisdiction and duties of auditor
1674 general shall be transferred as constitutional duties to the
1675 elected auditor general.
Page 67 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1676 (c) The statutory jurisdiction and duties of the
1677 commissioner of agriculture remaining after the application of
1678 this section shall be transferred as constitutional duties to
1679 the commissioner of agriculture.
1680 (d) Any statutory authority given to the governor over the
1681 division of emergency management, the state fire marshal, the
1682 Department of Veterans' Affairs, and the Department of Military
1683 Affairs shall become constitutional authority of the lieutenant
1684 governor. This subsection does not apply to statutory authority
1685 over appointments.
1686 (e) The statutory jurisdiction and duties of the secretary
1687 of commerce and the labor related jurisdiction and duties of the
1688 secretary of the department of business and professional
1689 regulation shall be transferred as constitutional duties to the
1690 commissioner of labor. Any statutory authority given to the
1691 governor over the Department of Commerce and the labor-related
1692 authority over the department of business and professional
1693 regulation shall become constitutional authority of the
1694 commissioner of labor. This subsection does not apply to
1695 statutory authority over appointments.
1696 (f) The statutory jurisdiction and duties given to the
1697 commissioner of agriculture over firearm regulation and consumer
1698 affairs shall transfer as constitutional duties to the attorney
1699 general. Any statutory authority given to the governor over the
1700 human rights commission, the commission on offender review, the
Page 68 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1701 Department of Elderly Affairs, the Department of Juvenile
1702 Justice, the Department of Corrections, and the division of
1703 administrative hearings shall become constitutional authority of
1704 the attorney general. This subsection does not apply to
1705 statutory authority over appointments.
1706 (g) The statutory jurisdiction and duties given to the
1707 insurance commissioner shall transfer as constitutional duties
1708 to the commissioner of health and insurance. Any statutory
1709 authority given to the governor over the Florida housing finance
1710 corporation, the Department of Health, the agency for persons
1711 with disabilities, the Department of Highway Safety and Motor
1712 Vehicles, and housing-related authority of the Department of
1713 Business and Professional Regulation shall become constitutional
1714 authority of the commissioner of health and insurance. This
1715 subsection does not apply to statutory authority over
1716 appointments.
1717 (h) The statutory jurisdiction and duties of the
1718 commissioner of education shall be transferred as constitutional
1719 duties to the elected commissioner of education. Any statutory
1720 authority given to the governor over the Department of Education
1721 and the Department of Children and Families shall become the
1722 constitutional authority of the commissioner of education. This
1723 subsection does not apply to statutory authority over
1724 appointments.
1725 (i) The statutory jurisdiction and duties of the clerks of
Page 69 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1726 courts related to the recording of instruments are transferred
1727 as constitutional duties to the commissioner of lands. Any
1728 statutory authority given to the governor over the Fish and
1729 Wildlife Conservation Commission, the Department of
1730 Environmental Protection, and the Department of Transportation
1731 shall become constitutional authority of the commissioner of
1732 lands. This subsection does not apply to statutory authority
1733 over appointments.
1734 (j) The statutory jurisdiction and duties of the public
1735 service commission are transferred as constitutional duties to
1736 the board of utility directors.
1737 BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that the following statement be
1738 placed on the ballot:
1739 CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT
1740 ARTICLE I, SECTION 24
1741 ARTICLE II, SECTION 2
1742 ARTICLE III, SECTIONS 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 8, 15, 16, 17, AND 19
1743 ARTICLE IV, SECTIONS 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 14, 15, 16, AND 17
1744 ARTICLE V, SECTION 11
1745 ARTICLE VII, SECTIONS 4 AND 8
1746 ARTICLE VIII, SECTION 1
1747 ARTICLE IX, SECTION 7
1748 ARTICLE XI, SECTIONS 1, 3, AND 5
1749 ARTICLE XII
Page 70 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1750 REORGANIZATION OF FLORIDA GOVERNMENT.—Proposing an
1751 amendment to the State Constitution to move the seat of state
1752 government; revise the size and procedures of the Legislature;
1753 create new procedures for redistricting, vacancies and
1754 appointments are; revise the amendment process, create new
1755 cabinet positions, reorganize duties of the cabinet, allow
1756 recall elections, allow counties to become charter counties; and
1757 create a number of elected boards to provide oversight of the
1758 Governor, taxation, public utilities, and state universities.
1759 BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that the following statement be
1760 placed on the ballot if a court declares the preceding statement
1761 defective and the decision of the court is not reversed:
1762 CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT
1763 A ARTICLE I, SECTION 24
1764 ARTICLE II, SECTION 2
1765 ARTICLE III, SECTIONS 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 8, 15, 16, 17, AND 19
1766 ARTICLE IV, SECTIONS 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 14, 15, 16, AND 17
1767 ARTICLE V, SECTION 11
1768 ARTICLE VII, SECTIONS 4 AND 8
1769 ARTICLE VIII, SECTION 1
1770 ARTICLE IX, SECTION 7
1771 ARTICLE XI, SECTIONS 1, 3, AND 5
1772 ARTICLE XII
1773 REORGANIZATION OF FLORIDA GOVERNMENT.—Proposing amendments
1774 to the State Constitution to require public records and meetings
Page 71 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1775 exemption of expire after 6 years unless a supermajority of each
1776 house votes to continue such exemption; move the seat of state
1777 government; revise the size of the Legislature; require each
1778 house to elect a presiding officer; require each house to
1779 designate an executive director; prohibit members from serving
1780 in more than one officer position including committee chair;
1781 allowing legislative officers to be removed; require members of
1782 the Legislature to be paid based the median household income of
1783 a resident of the state; require member training; create minimum
1784 staffing requirements and training for members and committees;
1785 require a Parliamentarian be selected to serve for a 10-year
1786 term; allow the Parliamentarian to only be removed with cause by
1787 a 2/3 vote; provide certain office space and resources to
1788 members; require members meet in an organizational session;
1789 require the Legislature to meet twice a year and for committees
1790 to meet during certain months; revising the membership needed to
1791 constitute a quorum; prohibit limits on debate and requires
1792 minimum time for debate of certain bills; create procedures to
1793 move a bill out of a committee or require a committee hear a
1794 bill; create procedures to end debate on a bill; revising
1795 requirements for posting of bills and amendments; prohibit votes
1796 during certain hours unless necessary to prevent a government
1797 shutdown; create independent Offices of Bill Drafting and
1798 Research; require livestreaming, video archiving, and
1799 transcripts of the Legislature; require legislative staff pass a
Page 72 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1800 civil service exam; require certain committees to be created;
1801 provide requirements for selecting members for committees and
1802 subcommittees; revise committee procedures; revise procedures
1803 for debate and discussion on the floor; prohibit the veto of
1804 appropriations to the Legislature; require Legislative vacancies
1805 be filled by a special election within 120 days; create
1806 independent redistricting commissions for the House of
1807 Representatives, the Senate, and congressional districts;
1808 establish a screening panel and procedure to review commission
1809 applicants; provide that commissioners will be compensated at
1810 the legislative per diem rate; provide commission meeting
1811 requirements and responsibilities; provide that if a commission
1812 hires an attorney, the commission shall be considered the
1813 client; require at least 15 public hearings be held across the
1814 state; requiring each commission to draw district maps based
1815 solely on constitutional provisions; require that three final
1816 maps be approved by at least a two-thirds supermajority,
1817 including votes from at least two independent or minor party
1818 affiliates; require the Legislature to select one map from the
1819 three submitted, by a majority vote, not subject to a
1820 gubernatorial veto; provide that the Supreme Court shall have
1821 original and exclusive jurisdiction over any litigation related
1822 to a district map; provide that if the Legislature fails to
1823 adopt a joint resolution, the Supreme Court shall select the
1824 most compact map from the three submitted, but may not amend any
Page 73 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1825 map; provide that if the Supreme Court finds the Legislature's
1826 adopted map invalid, the Governor shall reconvene the
1827 commissions to create a lawful replacement; create a nonpartisan
1828 revenue estimating conference; require counties receive services
1829 relative to the amount of tax revenue the county generates;
1830 require certain programs be reviewed on a regular schedule;
1831 revise the positions requiring Senate confirmation; require
1832 confirmations hearings be public, noticed in advanced, and that
1833 participants appear in person and disclose conflicts; revise how
1834 vacancies are filled; requiring amendments to the State
1835 Constitution to be shared in public meetings across the state;
1836 prohibit regulation of the amendment or initiative process;
1837 declare existing regulations passed after a certain date to be
1838 void; revise downward the required vote to amend the
1839 constitution to 55 percent; revise the line of succession for
1840 the Governor and cabinet; require the Lieutenant Governor be
1841 elected separately from the Governor; revise the duties of the
1842 Lieutenant Governor and cabinet; create new cabinet positions of
1843 the Auditor General, the Commissioner of Lands, the Health and
1844 Insurance Commissioner, the Labor Commissioner, and the
1845 Education Commissioner; replace the Chief Financial Officer with
1846 a position of Controller; transfer the Governor's authority over
1847 certain departments to members of the cabinet; prohibit the
1848 Governor from removing elected officials from office unless such
1849 official is charged with a crime; require the Legislature to
Page 74 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HJR 947 2026
1850 select the Secretary of State; create a General Land Office
1851 responsible for the managing all property instruments and
1852 recording duties; create an elected Executive Council that
1853 provides guidance to the Governor and may override contracts and
1854 pardons, make nominations, and must approve the budget; create
1855 an elected Board of Equalization to oversee tax and
1856 administration and make recommendations to the tax and budget
1857 reform commission; replace the Board of Governors with an
1858 elected Board of Control to oversee state universities; replace
1859 the Florida Public Service Commission with an elected Board of
1860 Utility Directors; allow the recall of statewide officers and
1861 members of the Legislature; and allow counties without charters
1862 to become charter counties.
Page 75 of 75
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hjr947-00